test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-ristjkas14_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - ritśkas: # Noun (14) ritśkas 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     ritśkas+N+Sg+Nom: ritśkas
     ritśkas+N+Sg+Gen: ritśka
     ritśkas+N+Sg+Par: [ritśkast, ritśkat]
     ritśkas+N+Sg+Ill: [ritśkahe, ritśkadõ]
     ritśkas+N+Sg+Ine: [ritśkan, ritśkah, ritśkahn]
     ritśkas+N+Sg+Ela: ritśkast
     ritśkas+N+Sg+All: ritśkalõ
     ritśkas+N+Sg+Ade: ritśkal
     ritśkas+N+Sg+Abl: ritśkalt
     ritśkas+N+Sg+Tra: ritśkas
     ritśkas+N+Sg+Ter: ritśkaniq
     ritśkas+N+Sg+Abe: ritśkaldaq
     ritśkas+N+Sg+Com: ritśkagaq
     ritśkas+N+Pl+Nom: ritśkaq
     ritśkas+N+Pl+Gen: [ritśkidõ, ritśkiidõ, ritśkastõ]
     ritśkas+N+Pl+Par: [ritśkit, ritśkiid]
     ritśkas+N+Pl+Ill: [ritśkihe, ritśkiihe, ritśkidõ, ritśkiidõ, ritśkastõhe, ritśkastõdõ]
     ritśkas+N+Pl+Ine: [ritśkin, ritśkiin, ritśkih, ritśkiih, ritśkihn, ritśkiihn, ritśkastõn, ritśkastõh, ritśkastõhn]
     ritśkas+N+Pl+Ela: [ritśkist, ritśkiist, ritśkastõst]
     ritśkas+N+Pl+All: [ritśkilõ, ritśkiilõ, ritśkastõlõ]
     ritśkas+N+Pl+Ade: [ritśkil, ritśkiil, ritśkastõl]
     ritśkas+N+Pl+Abl: [ritśkilt, ritśkiilt, ritśkastõlt]
     ritśkas+N+Pl+Tra: [ritśkis, ritśkiis, ritśkastõs]
     ritśkas+N+Pl+Ter: [ritśkiniq, ritśkiiniq, ritśkastõniq]
     ritśkas+N+Pl+Abe: [ritśkildaq, ritśkiildaq, ritśkastõldaq]
     ritśkas+N+Pl+Com: [ritśkidõgaq, ritśkiidõgaq, ritśkastõgaq]
